New York, session 2025-2026, S6615.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 360-p of the general business law, as added by 2 chapter 319 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 360-p. Fees. The application for registration or renewal shall be 4 accompanied by a filing fee [or fifty] of one hundred dollars payable to 5 the secretary of state. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10032-01-5